Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1223
Motorboat; change of ownership; new
application; original number retained; when.

If the ownership
of a vessel changes, a new application form with fee shall be filed with the
county treasurer and a new certificate of number stating the number
awarded shall be issued in the same manner as provided for in an original
award of number. The county treasurer may allow the new owner to retain the
previously assigned boat number if the existing number is serviceable. The
commission shall provide procedures for the county treasurers to follow in
determining whether the existing number is serviceable.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 23;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 12.